Maryland, session 2025, HB0974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1A–10.
(a) [Except] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) (E) OF THIS SECTION AND EXCEPT
as provided in subsections (b) and, (c), AND (D) of this section, a carrier shall provide
coverage for and may not impose any cost–sharing requirements, including copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles for:
(1) evidence–based items or services that have in effect a rating of A or B
in the [current] MOST RECENT recommendations of the United States Preventive Services
Task Force with respect to the individual involved;
(2) immunizations for routine use in children, adolescents, and adults that
have in effect a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices
of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to the individual involved,
if the recommendation:
(i) has been adopted by the Director of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention; and
(ii) is listed on the Immunization Schedules of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention for routine use;
(3) with respect to infants, children, and adolescents, evidence–informed
preventive care and screenings provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the
Health Resources and Services Administration; and
(4) with respect to women:
(i) to the extent not provided in item (ii) of this item, preventive care
and screenings as provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health
Resources and Services Administration for purposes of § 2713(a)(4) of the federal Public
Health Service Act; and
(ii) subject to § 15–826(c) of this title, contraceptive coverage as
provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources and Services
Administration for purposes of § 2713(a)(4) of the federal Public Health Service Act.

HOUSE BILL 974 3
(b) To the extent that cost–sharing is otherwise allowed under federal or State
law, a health benefit plan that uses a network of providers may impose cost–sharing
requirements on the coverage described in subsection (a) of this section for items or services
delivered by an out–of–network provider.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223(C)(2).
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A HIGH
DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, A CARRIER MAY APPLY THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT
OF THE HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN TO THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT
THE COVERAGE IS INCLUDED IN THE SAFE HARBOR PROVISIONS FOR PREVENTIVE
CARE UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223(C)(2)(C).
(c) (D) This section may not be construed to prohibit a carrier from providing
coverage for services in addition to those recommended by the United States Preventive
Services Task Force or to deny coverage for services that are not recommended by the Task
Force.
(D) (E) (1) THE SUBJECT TO § 15–826(C) OF THIS TITLE:
(1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ENFORCE THIS SECTION CONSISTENT
WITH FEDERAL RULES AND GUIDANCE THE RECOMMENDATIONS AND GUIDELINES
IN EFFECT ON DECEMBER 31, 2024., SET BY THE UNITED STATES PREVENTIVE
SERVICES TASK FORCE, THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION
PRACTICES OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION, OR THE
HEALTH RESOURCES AND SERVICES ADMINISTRATION, AND RELATED FEDERAL
RULES OR GUIDANCE; AND
(2) THE THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, CONSISTENT
WITH FEDERAL STATUTES, RULES, AND GUIDANCE IN EFFECT:
1. ON DECEMBER 31, 2024; OR
2. AT A LATER DATE THAT ENHANCE THE SCOPE OF
PREVENTIVE SERVICES TO THE BENEFIT OF CONSUMERS IN THE STATE; AND OR
(II) RELATED TO TO REQUIRE CARRIERS TO PROVIDE
COVERAGE WITHOUT IMPOSING COST–SHARING REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING
COPAYMENTS, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLES, FOR ANY FUTURE PREVENTIVE
SERVICES RECOMMENDATIONS AND GUIDELINES ISSUED AFTER DECEMBER 31,

HOUSE BILL 974
2024, BY THE UNITED STATES PREVENTIVE SERVICES TASK FORCE, THE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION, OR THE HEALTH RESOURCES AND SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION, OR AND RELATED FEDERAL RULES OR GUIDANCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.